Utah statutes.
10-9a-302.   Planning commission powers and duties.

The planning commission shall make a recommendation to the legislative body for:

(1)  a general plan and amendments to the general plan;

(2)  land use ordinances, zoning maps, official maps, and amendments;

(3)  an appropriate delegation of power to at least one designated land use authority to hear and act on a land use application;

(4)  an appropriate delegation of power to at least one appeal authority to hear and act on an appeal from a decision of the land use authority; and

(5)  application processes that:

(a)  may include a designation of routine land use matters that, upon application and proper notice, will receive informal streamlined review and action if the application is uncontested; and

(b)  shall protect the right of each:

(i)  applicant and third party to require formal consideration of any application by a land use authority;

(ii)  applicant, adversely affected party, or municipal officer or employee to appeal a land use authority's decision to a separate appeal authority; and

(iii)  participant to be heard in each public hearing on a contested application.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

